Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska79-2,121
Complaint; failure of governing board to act; claimant's remedies.

If the governing board fails to dispose of any written complaint filed pursuant to the Nebraska Equal Opportunity in Education Act within one hundred eighty days after the date of filing, such complaint may be withdrawn by the claimant and he or she may then proceed to file an original action in the district court of the judicial district where such educational institution is located pursuant to section 79-2,120. Such action must be filed within two years after the date of the filing of such complaint.

Laws 1982, LB 628, § 8;

R.S.1943, (1994), § 79-3008;

Laws 1996, LB 900, § 125.